Nevada, session 83, AB205.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 389.036 is hereby amended to read as follows:
389.036 1. The board of trustees of a school district shall
establish a course or unit of a course of:
(a) Factual instruction concerning the human immunodeficiency
virus; and
(b) Instruction on the human reproductive system, related
communicable diseases and sexual responsibility.
2. Each board of trustees shall appoint an advisory committee
consisting of:
(a) Five parents of children who attend schools in the district;
and
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
(b) Four representatives, one from each of four of the following
professions or occupations:
(1) Medicine or nursing;
(2) Counseling;
(3) Religion;
(4) Pupils who attend schools in the district; or
(5) Teaching.
 This committee shall advise the district concerning the content of
and materials to be used in a course [of instruction] or unit
established pursuant to this section, and the recommended ages of
the pupils to whom the course or unit is offered. The final decision
on these matters must be that of the board of trustees.
3. The subjects of the courses or units may be taught only by a
teacher or school nurse whose qualifications have been previously
approved by the board of trustees.
4. The parent or guardian of each pupil to whom a course or
unit is offered must [first] be furnished written notice , not later
than 4 weeks after the start of the school year or 4 weeks before
the first date on which the course or unit will commence,
whichever is earlier, that the course or unit will be offered. The
notice must be given in the usual manner used by the local district to
transmit written material to parents, and must contain a form for the
signature of the parent or guardian of the pupil [consenting]
refusing to authorize the pupil’s attendance [.] in the course or
unit. Upon receipt of the written [consent] refusal of the parent or
guardian, the pupil [may attend the course. If the written consent of
the parent or guardian is not received, the pupil] must be excused
from [such attendance] attending the course or unit without any
penalty as to credits or academic standing. If the written refusal of
the parent or guardian is not received, the pupil must attend each
lesson of the course or unit. Any course or unit offered pursuant to
this section is not a requirement for graduation.
5. The form required to be provided to a parent or guardian
of a pupil pursuant to subsection 4:
(a) May be made available on the secure Internet website of
the school district for the electronic signature of the parent or
guardian and may be included with any online registration to
register a pupil with a school.
(b) Must include a notification that the parent or guardian of a
pupil may, at any time during the school year, refuse to authorize
or withdraw authorization for the pupil to attend the course or
unit.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
6. All instructional materials to be used in a course or unit
must be available for inspection by parents or guardians of pupils at
reasonable times and locations before the course or unit is taught,
and appropriate written notice of the availability of the material
must be furnished to all parents and guardians.
Sec. 2. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)